Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.084, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition. (a) A sitting member of the legislature is prohibited from accepting employment with or otherwise receiving compensation for services performed from: (1) a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from lobbying, government relations or government affairs services; (2) a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from facilitating government relations or government affairs services between two third parties; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) any other business that employs or contracts with lobbyists, government relations or government affairs professionals, if the member's job duties include acting in that capacity or providing direct or indirect consulting, advice, or administrative support for that worknew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) a nonprofit organization that receives grant funding from the statenew text end . (b) This prohibition applies regardless of the location where the work of the business is substantially conducted or its clients are located. (c) The house of representatives and the senate must adopt rules to enforce this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.0597, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Private employment and compensation. new text end new text begin At the time of appointment and while serving as an appointed member of a multimember agency, a person must not be employed by or otherwise receive compensation for services performed from a nonprofit organization that receives grant funding from the state. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.06, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Private employmentnew text begin and compensationnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end No former commissioner or deputy commissioner may, within one year after leaving the position of commissioner or deputy commissioner in a department or agency, appear or participate in proceedings of that department or agency representing the interests of private persons. new text begin (b) At the time of appointment and while serving as a commissioner or deputy commissioner, a person must not be employed by or otherwise receive compensation for services performed from a nonprofit organization that receives grant funding from the state. new text end